Rhode Island statutes. Title 9 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure Generally
Chapter 19.1 Newsman’s Privilege Act

9-19.1-1.
“Newspaper” defined.

A newspaper or periodical as described in this chapter must be issued at regular intervals and have a paid circulation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 86, § 1.

9-19.1-2.
Nondisclosure of confidential information.

Except as provided in §

9-19.1-3

, no person shall be required by any court, grand jury, agency, department, or commission of the state to reveal confidential association, to disclose any confidential information, or to disclose the source of any confidential information received or obtained by him or her in his or her capacity as a reporter, editor, commentator, journalist, writer, correspondent, newsphotographer, or other person directly engaged in the gathering or presentation of news for any accredited newspaper, periodical, press association, newspaper syndicate, wire service, or radio or television station.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 86, § 1.

9-19.1-3.
Qualifications.

The privilege conferred by §

9-19.1-2

shall not apply to any information which has at any time been published, broadcast, or otherwise made public by the person claiming the privilege.

The privilege conferred by §

9-19.1-2

shall not apply:

To the source of any allegedly defamatory information in any case where the defendant, in a civil action for defamation, asserts a defense based on the source of the information; or

To the source of any information concerning the details of any grand jury or other proceeding which was required to be secret under the laws of the state.

In any case where a person claims a privilege conferred by this statute, the person seeking the information or the source of the information may apply to the superior court for an order divesting the privilege. If the court, after hearing the parties, shall find that there is substantial evidence that disclosure of the information or of the source of the information is necessary to permit a criminal prosecution for the commission of a specific felony, or to prevent a threat to human life, and that the information or the source of the information is not available from other prospective witnesses, the court may make such order as may be proper under the circumstance. Any such order shall be appealable under the provisions of chapter 24 of title 9.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 86, § 1.